North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 3. State Highway System.

Part 1. Highway System.

§ 136-45.
General purpose of law; control, repair and maintenance of highways.

The general purpose of the laws creating the Department of Transportation is that said Department of Transportation shall take over, establish, construct, and maintain a statewide system of hard-surfaced and other dependable highways running to all county seats, and to all principal towns, State parks, and principal State institutions, and linking up with state highways of adjoining states and with national highways into national forest reserves by the most practical routes, with special view of development of agriculture, commercial and natural resources of the State, and, except as otherwise provided by law, for the further purpose of permitting the State to assume control of the State highways, repair, construct, and reconstruct and maintain said highways at the expense of the entire State, and to relieve the counties and cities and towns of the State of this burden.

History.

1921, c. 2, s. 2; C.S., s. 3846(a); 1943, c. 410; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 2007-428, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-428, s. 2, effective August 23, 2007, near the middle of the section, inserted “except as otherwise provided by law” and made minor punctuation changes.

§§ 136-46,
136-47.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 464, s. 22.

§§ 136-48 through 136-50.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1943, c. 410.

Part 2. County Public Roads Incorporated into State Highway System.

§ 136-51.
Maintenance of county public roads vested in Department of Transportation.

From and after July 1, 1931, the exclusive control and management and responsibility for all public roads in the several counties shall be vested in the Department of Transportation as hereinafter provided, and all county, district, and township highway or road commissioners, by whatever name designated, and whether created under public, public-local, or private acts, shall be abolished:

Provided, that for the purpose of providing for the payment of any bonded or other indebtedness, and for the interest thereon, that may be outstanding as an obligation of any county, district, or township commission herein abolished, the boards of county commissioners of the respective counties are hereby constituted fiscal agents, and are vested with authority and it shall be their duty to levy such taxes on the taxable property or persons within the respective county, district, or township by or for which said bonds or other indebtedness were issued or incurred and as are now authorized by law to the extent that the same may be necessary to provide for the payment of such obligations; and the respective commissions herein abolished shall on or before July 1, 1931, turn over to said boards of county commissioners any moneys on hand or evidences of indebtedness properly applicable to the discharge of any such indebtedness (except such moneys as are mentioned in paragraph (a) above); and all uncollected special road taxes shall be payable to said boards of county commissioners, and the portion of said taxes applicable to indebtedness shall be applied by said commissioners to said indebtedness, or invested in a sinking fund according to law. All that portion of said taxes or other funds coming into the hands of said county commissioners and properly applicable to the maintenance or improvement of the public roads of the county shall be held by them as a special road fund and disbursed upon proper orders of the Department of Transportation.

Provided, further, that in order to fully carry out the provisions of this section the respective boards of county commissioners are vested with full authority to prosecute all suitable legal actions.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a county from participating in the cost of rights-of-way, construction, reconstruction, improvement, or maintenance of a road on the State highway system under agreement with the Department of Transportation. A county is authorized and empowered to acquire land by dedication and acceptance, purchase, or eminent domain and make improvements to portions of the State highway system lying within or outside the county limits utilizing local funds that have been authorized for that purpose. The provisions of

G.S. 153A-15

apply to any county attempting to acquire property outside its limits. All improvements to the State highway system shall be done in accordance with the specifications and requirements of the Department of Transportation.

History.

1931, c. 145, s. 7; 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 2007-428, s. 3.

§§ 136-52,
136-53.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 464, s. 22.

Part 3. Power to Make Changes in Highway System.

§ 136-54.
Power to make changes.

The Board of Transportation shall be authorized, when in its judgment the public good requires it, to change, alter, add to, or abandon and substitute new sections for, any portion of the State highway system.

History.

1927, c. 46, s. 1; 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1965, c. 538, s. 2; 1967, c. 1128, s. 1; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 23.

Cross References.

See case notes under

G.S. 136-20

.

§ 136-55.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 143, s. 1.

§ 136-55.1.
Notice of abandonment.

At least 60 days prior to any action by the Department of Transportation abandoning a segment of road and removing the same from the State highway system for maintenance, except roads abandoned on request of the county commissioners under

G.S. 136-63

, the Department of Transportation shall notify by registered mail or personal delivery all owners of property adjoining the section of road to be abandoned whose whereabouts can be ascertained by due diligence. Said notice shall describe the section of road which is proposed to be abandoned and shall give the date, place and time of the Department of Transportation meeting at which the action abandoning said section of road is to be taken.

In keeping with its overall zoning scheme and long-range plans regarding the extraterritorial jurisdiction area, a municipality may keep open and assume responsibility for maintenance of a road within one mile of its corporate limits once it is abandoned from the State highway system.

History.

1957, c. 1063; 1967, c. 1128, s. 3; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1993, c. 533, s. 13.

§ 136-56.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1967, c. 1128, s. 4.

§ 136-57.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1965, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 136-58.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 464, s. 22.

§ 136-59.
No court action against Board of Transportation.

No action shall be maintained in any of the courts of this State against the Board of Transportation to determine the location of any State highways or portion thereof, by any person, corporation, or municipal corporation.

History.

1927, c. 46, s. 7; 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1967, c. 1128, s. 5; 1973, c. 507, s. 5.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1980 administrative law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1026 (1981).

§§ 136-60,
136-61.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 507, s. 23.

§ 136-62.
Right of petition.

The citizens of the State shall have the right to present petitions to the board of county commissioners, and through the board to the Department of Transportation, concerning additions to the system and improvement of roads. The board of county commissioners shall receive such petitions, forwarding them on to the Board of Transportation with their recommendations. Petitions on hand at the time of the periodic preparation of the secondary road plan shall be considered by the representatives of the Department of Transportation in preparation of that plan, with report on action taken by these representatives on such petitions to the board of commissioners at the time of consultation. The citizens of the State shall at all times have opportunities to discuss any aspect of secondary road additions, maintenance, and construction, with representatives of the Department of Transportation in charge of the preparation of the secondary road plan, and if not then satisfied opportunity to discuss any such aspect with the division engineer, the Secretary of Transportation, and the Board of Transportation in turn.

History.

1931, c. 145, s. 14; 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 65, s. 7; 1965, c. 55, s. 12; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, ss. 7.1, 24, 24.1.

§ 136-63.
Change or abandonment of roads.

The board of county commissioners of any county may, on its own motion or on petition of a group of citizens, request the Board of Transportation to change or abandon any road in the secondary system when the best interest of the people of the county will be served thereby. The Board of Transportation shall thereupon make inquiry into the proposed change or abandonment, and if in its opinion the public interest demands it, shall make such change or abandonment. If the change or abandonment shall affect a road connecting with any street of a city or town, the change or abandonment shall not be made until the street-governing body of the city or town shall have been duly notified and given opportunity to be heard on the question. Any request by a board of county commissioners or street-governing body of a city refused by the Board of Transportation may be presented again upon the expiration of 12 months.

In keeping with its overall zoning scheme and long-range plans regarding the extraterritorial jurisdiction area, a municipality may keep open and assume responsibility for maintenance of a road within one mile of its corporate limits once it is abandoned from the State highway system.

History.

1931, c. 145, s. 15; 1957, c. 65, s. 8; 1965, c. 55, s. 13; 1973, c. 507, s. 221/2; 1975, c. 19, s. 45; 1977, c. 464, s. 25; 1993, c. 533, s. 14.

§ 136-64.
Filing of complaints with Department of Transportation; hearing and appeal.

In the event of failure to maintain the roads of the State highway system or any county road system in good condition, the board of county commissioners of such county may file complaint with the Department of Transportation. When any such complaint is filed, the Department of Transportation shall at once investigate the same, and if the same be well founded, the said Department of Transportation shall at once order the repair and maintenance of the roads complained of and investigate the negligence of the persons in charge of the roads so complained of, and if upon investigation the person in charge of the road complained of be at fault, he may be discharged from the service of the Department of Transportation. The board of commissioners of any county, who shall feel aggrieved at the action of the Department of Transportation upon complaint filed, may appeal from the decision of the Department of Transportation to the Governor, and it shall be the duty of the Governor to adjust the differences between the board of county commissioners and the Department of Transportation.

History.

1921, c. 2, s. 20; C.S., s. 3846(11); 1931, c. 145, s. 17; 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

§ 136-64.1.
Applications for intermittent closing of roads within watershed improvement project by Department of Transportation; notice; regulation by Department; delegation of authority; markers.

Upon proper application by the board of commissioners of a drainage district established under the provisions of Chapter 156 of the General Statutes of North Carolina, by the board of trustees of a watershed improvement district established under the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 139 of the General Statutes, by the board of county commissioners of any county operating a county watershed improvement program under the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 139 of the General Statutes, by the board of commissioners of any watershed improvement commission appointed by a board of county commissioners or by the board of supervisors of any soil and water conservation district designated by a board of county commissioners to exercise authority in carrying out a county watershed improvement program, the Department of Transportation, for roads coming under its jurisdictional control, is hereby authorized to permit the intermittent closing of any secondary road within the boundaries of any watershed improvement project operated by the applicants, whenever in the judgment of the Department of Transportation it is necessary to do so, and when the secondary road will be intermittently subject to inundation by floodwaters retained by an approved watershed improvement project.

Before any permit may be issued for the temporary inundation and closing of such a road, an application for such permit shall be made to the Department of Transportation by the public body having jurisdiction over the watershed improvement project. The application shall specify the secondary road involved, the anticipated frequency and duration of intermittent flooding of the secondary road involved, and shall request that a permit be granted to the applicant public body to allow the intermittent closing of the road.

Upon receipt of such an application the Department of Transportation shall give public notice of the proposed action by publication once each week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties within which the proposed intermittent closing of road or roads would occur; and such notices shall contain a description of the places of beginning and the places of ending of such intermittent closing. In addition, the Department of Transportation shall give notice to all public utilities or common carriers having facilities located within the rights-of-way of any roads being closed by mailing copies of such notices to the appropriate offices of the public utility or common carrier having jurisdiction over the affected facilities of the public utility or common carrier. Not sooner than 14 days after publication and mailing of notices, the Department of Transportation or the municipality may issue its permit with respect to such road.

The Department of Transportation shall have the discretion to deny any application submitted pursuant to this section, or it may grant a permit on any condition it deems warranted. The Department, however, shall consider the use of alternate routes available during flooding of the roads, and any inconvenience to the public or temporary loss of access to business, homes and property. The Department shall have the authority to promulgate regulations for the issuance of permits under this section and it may delegate the authority for the consideration, issuance or denial of such permits to the Chief Engineer. Any applicant granted a permit pursuant to this section shall cause suitable markers to be installed on the secondary road to advise the general public of the intermittent closing of the road or roads involved. Such markers shall be located and approved by the Chief Engineer.

History.

1975, c. 639, s. 1; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 2012-85, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-85, s. 6, effective June 26, 2012, substituted “Chief Engineer” for “State Highway Administrator” twice in subsection (d).

§§ 136-65,
136-66.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1943, c. 410.